Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-803
Institute; director; appointment; qualifications; responsibilities.

The director of the institute shall be appointed by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska. He shall be the chief executive officer and scientific director of the institute, shall hold professorial rank and shall be responsible to the Board of Regents through the Chancellor of the University of Nebraska Medical Center and the president of the university.

Laws 1972, LB 1374, § 3.